District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2101

Expenses of indigent patients — Payment from District revenues

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1877, 19 Stat. 347, ch. 105
July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 309, ch. 209, § 1
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(u)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-601.
1973 Ed., § 32-401.

Effective Dates

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.